Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-115 Securities intermediary and
others not liable to adverse claimant. A securities intermediary that has
transferred a financial asset pursuant to an effective entitlement order, or a
broker or other agent or bailee that has dealt with a financial asset at the
direction of its customer or principal, is not liable to a person having an
adverse claim to the financial asset, unless the securities intermediary, or
broker or other agent or bailee:

(1) Took the action after it had been served with an injunction,
restraining order, or other legal process enjoining it from doing so, issued by
a court of competent jurisdiction, and had a reasonable opportunity to act on
the injunction, restraining order, or other legal process;

(2) Acted in collusion with the wrongdoer in
violating the rights of the adverse claimant; or

(3) In the case of a security certificate that has
been stolen, acted with notice of the adverse claim. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next